src/morphology/phonology.twolc
!! =================================== !
!! The Basque  morphophonological file !
!! =================================== !

Alphabet
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n ñ o p q r s t u v w x y z
 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N Ñ O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z 

 %>:0 ;

Sets

 Vow = a e i o u;

 Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z ð þ ;
 
 Nas = m n ;
 NonNas = b c d f g h j k l p q r s t v w x z ð þ ;

Rules


"ae -> e"
 a:0 <=> _ %>: e ;
 
 
"r doubling"
 0:r <=> r %>: _ Vow ;
  
 
